pt-PT: Modalidade da lâmina de patins: Patinagem artística; Guarda-redes de hóquei; Jogador de hóquei; Dança no gelo; Recreativo; Patinagem de velocidade - pista longa; Patinagem de velocidade - pista curta; Patinagem sincronizada; Outro
hu: Korcsolyapenge szakág: Műkorcsolya; Jégkorongkapus; Jégkorongjátékos; Jégtánc; Szabadidős; Gyorskorcsolya – nagypályás; Gyorskorcsolya – rövidpályás; Szinkronkorcsolya; Egyéb
zh-TW: 冰刀項目: 花式滑冰; 曲棍球守門員; 曲棍球球員; 冰舞; 休閒用; 競速滑冰 - 長道; 競速滑冰 - 短道; 團體花式滑冰; 其他
bg-BG: Дисциплина на острието за кънки: Фигурно пързаляне; Хокеен вратар; Хокеист; Танци на лед; За любители; Бързо пързаляне – дълга писта; Бързо пързаляне – шорттрек; Синхронно пързаляне; Друга
fr: Discipline de la lame de patin: Patinage artistique; Gardien de but de hockey; Joueur de hockey; Danse sur glace; Loisir; Patinage de vitesse - longue piste; Patinage de vitesse - courte piste; Patinage synchronisé; Autre
cs: Disciplína na brusli s čepelí: Krasobruslení; Hokejový brankář; Hokejový hráč; Tance na ledě; Rekreační; Rychlobruslení – dlouhá dráha; Rychlobruslení – krátká dráha; Synchronizované bruslení; Jiné
da: Disciplin for skøjteklinge: Kunstskøjteløb; Ishockeymålmand; Ishockeyspiller; Isdans; Fritid; Hurtigløb på skøjter – langbane; Hurtigløb på skøjter – short track; Synkronskøjteløb; Andet
vi: Kỷ luật trượt băng: Trượt băng nghệ thuật; Thủ môn khúc côn cầu; Người chơi khúc côn cầu; Khiêu vũ trên băng; Giải trí; Trượt băng tốc độ - đường đua dài; Trượt băng tốc độ - đường đua ngắn; Trượt băng đồng diễn; Khác
sv: Skridskoblad – användningsområde : Konståkning; Hockeymålvakt; Hockeyspelare; Isdans; Fritid; Hastighetsåkning på skridskor – långbana; Hastighetsåkning på skridskor – kortbana; Synkro; Övrigt
ja: スケートブレード種目: フィギュアスケート; ホッケー ゴーリー; ホッケー プレイヤー; アイスダンス; レクリエーション用; スピードスケート - ロングトラック; スピードスケート - ショートトラック; シンクロナイズドスケーティング; その他
th: วินัยใบมีดสเก็ต: ฟิกเกอร์สเกต; ฮอกกี้ตำแหน่งผู้รักษาประตู; ฮอกกี้ตำแหน่งผู้เล่น; ไอซ์แดนซ์; นันทนาการ; สปีดสเกต - แทร็กยาว; สปีดสเกต - แทร็กสั้น; ซิงโครไนซ์สเกต; อื่นๆ
nb: Skøytebladdisiplin: Kunstløp; Hockeymålvakt; Hockeyspiller; Isdans; Fritid; Hurtigløp på skøyter – langbane; Hurtigløp på skøyter – kortbane; Synkronkunstløp; Annet
pl: Dyscyplina łyżwiarska: Łyżwiarstwo figurowe; Hokej - bramkarz; Hokej - gracz; Taniec na lodzie; Rekreacyjne; Łyżwiarstwo szybkie – tor długi; Łyżwiarstwo szybkie – short track; Łyżwiarstwo synchroniczne; Inne
zh-CN: 冰刀适用项目: 花样滑冰; 冰球守门员; 冰球运动员; 冰上舞蹈; 休闲; 速度滑冰 - 长道; 速度滑冰 - 短道; 队列滑; 其他
en: Skate blade discipline: Figure skating; Hockey goalie; Hockey player; Ice dance; Recreational; Speed skating - long track; Speed skating - short track; Synchronized skating; Other
de: Einsatzbereich der Schlittschuhkufe: Eiskunstlauf; Eishockey-Torwart; Eishockey-Spieler; Eistanz; Freizeit; Eisschnelllauf – Langbahn; Eisschnelllauf – Kurzbahn (Shorttrack); Synchroneiskunstlauf; Andere
hr-HR: Disciplina na oštrici klizaljki: Umjetničko klizanje; Hokejski vratar; Hokejaš; Ples na ledu; Rekreativno; Brzo klizanje – duge staze; Brzo klizanje – kratke staze; Sinkronizirano klizanje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Disciplină aferentă lamei patinei: Patinaj artistic; Portar de hochei; Jucător de hochei; Dans pe gheață; Recreere; Patinaj viteză - pistă lungă; Patinaj viteză - pistă scurtă; Patinaj sincron; Alta
pt-BR: Lâmina de patim disciplina: Patinação artística; Goleiro de hóquei; Jogador de hóquei; Dança no gelo; Recreativo; Patinação de velocidade - pista longa; Patinação de velocidade - pista curta; Patinação sincronizada; Outra
nl: Schaatsijzer discipline: Kunstschaatsen; Hockeykeeper; Hockeyspeler; IJsdansen; Recreatief; Langebaanschaatsen; Shorttrack; Synchroonschaatsen; Overig
lt-LT: Pačiūžų ašmenų disciplina: Dailusis čiuožimas; Ledo ritulio vartininko; Ledo ritulio žaidėjo; Šokiai ant ledo; Pramoginis čiuožimas; Greitasis čiuožimas – ilgas takas; Greitasis čiuožimas – trumpas takas; Sinchroninis čiuožimas; Kita
it: Disciplina delle lame da pattinaggio: Pattinaggio di figura; Portiere di hockey; Giocatore di hockey; Danza su ghiaccio; Ricreativo; Pattinaggio di velocità - pista lunga; Pattinaggio di velocità - short track; Pattinaggio sincronizzato; Altro
el: Τομέας λεπίδας σκέιτ: Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ; Τερματοφύλακας χόκεϊ; Παίκτης χόκεϊ; Χορός στον πάγο; Ερασιτεχνικό; Πατινάζ ταχύτητας - long track; Πατινάζ ταχύτητας - short track; Συγχρονισμένο πατινάζ; Άλλο
es: Disciplina de la cuchilla de patín: Patinaje artístico; Portero de hockey; Jugador de hockey; Danza sobre hielo; Recreativo; Patinaje de velocidad en pista larga; Patinaje de velocidad en pista corta; Patinaje sincronizado; Otro
tr: Paten bıçağı disiplini: Artistik patinaj; Hokey kalecisi; Hokey oyuncusu; Buz dansı; Hobi amaçlı; Sürat pateni - uzun kulvar; Sürat pateni - kısa kulvar; Senkronize buz pateni; Diğer
fi: Luistimen terän käyttölaji: Taitoluistelu; Jääkiekkomaalivahti; Jääkiekkopelaaja; Jäätanssi; Harraste; Pikaluistelu – pitkä rata; Pikaluistelu – lyhyt rata; Muodostelmaluistelu; Muu
ko: 스케이트 날 종목: 피겨 스케이팅; 하키 골리; 하키 플레이어; 아이스 댄스; 레크리에이션용; 스피드 스케이팅 - 롱트랙; 스피드 스케이팅 - 쇼트트랙; 싱크로나이즈드 스케이팅; 기타
sl-SI: Disciplina rezila drsalke: Umetnostno drsanje; Hokejski vratar; Hokejski igralec; Ples na ledu; Rekreativno; Hitrostno drsanje – dolge proge; Hitrostno drsanje – kratke proge; Sinhrono drsanje; Drugo
ru: Дисциплина конькового лезвия: Фигурное катание; Хоккей (вратарь); Хоккей (полевой игрок); Спортивные танцы на льду; Прогулочное катание; Конькобежный спорт (длинная дорожка); Шорт-трек; Синхронное катание; Другое
sk-SK: Krasokorčuliarska disciplína: Krasokorčuľovanie; Hokejový brankár; Hokejový hráč; Tance na ľade; Rekreačné; Rýchlokorčuľovanie – dlhá dráha; Rýchlokorčuľovanie – krátka dráha; Synchronizované krasokorčuľovanie; Iné